North Carolina, session 2025, HB17.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Section 3.3(a) of the Charter of the Town of Madison, being Chapter
289 of the 1973 Session Laws, as amended by S.L. 2004-54, reads as rewritten:
"(a) The members of the Board of Aldermen shall serve for staggered terms of four years,
and the Mayor shall serve for a term of two years, beginning the day and hour of the
organizational meeting following their election, as established by ordinance in accordance with
this Charter; provided, they shall serve until their successors are elected and qualify. In the 2005
municipal election, six members shall be elected. The three persons receiving the highest
numbers of votes shall receive four-year terms, and the three persons receiving the next highest
numbers of votes shall receive two-year terms. In 2007 and biennially thereafter, three members
shall be elected for four-year terms.four years."
SECTION 1.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
elections held on or after that date.
SECTION 2.(a) Section 4 of the Charter of the Town of Faith, being Chapter 363 of
the Private Laws of 1903, as rewritten by Chapter 159 of the 1961 Session Laws and Chapter
1111 of the 1979 Session Laws, reads as rewritten:
"Sec. 4. Elections in the Town of Faith shall be held at the time of the general election in each
even-numbered year. Except as otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in accordance
with Subchapter IX of the uniform municipal election laws in Chapter 163 of the General
Statutes."
SECTION 2.(b) Section 3 of the Charter of the Town of Faith, being Chapter 363 of
the Private Laws of 1903, as rewritten by Chapter 159 of the 1961 Session Laws, reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 3. That the officers of said Town shall consist of five aldermen, elected to serve a
four-year term who shall elect one of their number as mayor. The mayor and aldermen when
qualified as required by law, may elect a town clerk, a tax collector, a treasurer, such policemen
and other officers necessary to the preservation and regulation of the Town's best interests."
SECTION 2.(c) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of Faith in
2025. The terms of office for the aldermen in the Town of Faith serving on the effective date of
this act shall be extended by one year. Regular municipal elections shall be conducted in the
Town of Faith every four years beginning in 2026. In 2026 and quadrennially thereafter, five
aldermen shall be elected to serve four-year terms.
*H17-v-5*

SECTION 2.(d) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
elections held on or after that date.
SECTION 3.(a) Sections 3.1, 3.2, and 3.3 of the Charter of the Town of China
Grove, being S.L. 2002-42, read as rewritten:
"Section 3.1. Regular Municipal Elections. Regular municipal elections shall be held at the
time of the general election in each odd-numbered year. even-numbered year. Except as
otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal
election laws of North Carolina. Elections shall be conducted on a nonpartisan plurality basis and
the results determined using the nonpartisan plurality method as provided in G.S. 163-292.
"Section 3.2. Election of Aldermen. The Town shall continue to have staggered terms for its
Aldermen. Two Aldermen shall be elected at the regular municipal election in 2003 to four-year
terms and quadrennially thereafter. Three Aldermen shall be elected at the regular municipal
election in 2005 to four-year terms and quadrennially thereafter.for staggered four-year terms.
"Section 3.3. Election of Mayor. A Mayor shall be elected in the regular municipal election
in 2003 and quadrennially thereafter.for a four-year term."
SECTION 3.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of China
Grove in 2025. The terms of office for the three Aldermen serving on the effective date of this
section whose terms are set to expire in 2025 shall be extended by one year. The terms of office
for the two Aldermen and the Mayor serving on the effective date of this section whose terms are
set to expire in 2027 are extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the Town of China
Grove shall resume in even-numbered years beginning in 2026 with the same staggering of terms
as when elections were conducted in the odd-numbered years.
SECTION 3.(c) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
elections held on or after that date.
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 4th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Page 2 Session Law 2025-5 House Bill 17